aghul_verbs_formation.lexd
PATTERNS
VerbStem
Neg? VerbStem CheckInf? Participle
Neg? VerbStem > ((Inf1 > (StemPerf | CheckInf| (CheckInf StemPerf))) Inf2)

LEXICON Inf2
<inf>:c

LEXICON Inf1
<inf>:а

LEXICON Neg
<neg>:д
<neg>:да

LEXICON StemPerf
<perf>:гуна

LEXICON CheckInf
<checkadv>:чукьа

LEXICON Participle
<ipf><pt><prs>:аф
<ipf><pt><prf>:уф
<ipf><pt><hab>:аеф
<ipf><pt><aor>:унаеф
